Utah statutes.
63B-11-603.   Purchase and redemption requirements.
(1)  The notes and renewals of notes may provide the holders of the notes or
renewals of notes with the right to require the state or other persons to
purchase or redeem the notes or renewal notes before the stated maturity of
the notes or renewals.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the holders of the notes and renewals of
notes may not be provided with the right to require the state to repurchase or
redeem the notes and renewals of the notes before their stated maturity unless
the state has entered into one or more letter of credit agreements or other
liquidity facility agreements:
(a)  for the express purpose of those sales;
(b)  that require a financially responsible party or parties to the agreement
or agreements, other than the state, to purchase or redeem all or any portion
of the notes and renewals of notes tendered by the holders of the notes or
renewals of notes for repurchase or redemption before the stated maturity of
the notes and renewals of notes; and
(c)  that continue until the right of the holders of the notes and renewals of
notes to require repurchase or redemption of the notes and renewals of notes
before the stated maturity has ceased.
